Spanish.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX Ù Y 664
SFX Ù acar áquela acar
SFX Ù acar áquelas acar
SFX Ù acar áquelo acar
SFX Ù acar áquelos acar
SFX Ù acar áquenla acar
SFX Ù acar áquenlas acar
SFX Ù acar áquenlo acar
SFX Ù acar áquenlos acar
SFX Ù achar áchela achar
SFX Ù achar áchelas achar
SFX Ù achar áchelo achar
SFX Ù achar áchelos achar
SFX Ù achar áchenla achar
SFX Ù achar áchenlas achar
SFX Ù achar áchenlo achar
SFX Ù achar áchenlos achar
SFX Ù adar ádela adar
SFX Ù adar ádelas adar
SFX Ù adar ádelo adar
SFX Ù adar ádelos adar
SFX Ù adar ádenla adar
SFX Ù adar ádenlas adar
SFX Ù adar ádenlo adar
SFX Ù adar ádenlos adar
SFX Ù agar águela agar
SFX Ù agar águelas agar
SFX Ù agar águelo agar
SFX Ù agar águelos agar
SFX Ù agar águenla agar
SFX Ù agar águenlas agar
SFX Ù agar águenlo agar
SFX Ù agar águenlos agar
SFX Ù ajar ájela ajar
SFX Ù ajar ájelas ajar
SFX Ù ajar ájelo ajar
SFX Ù ajar ájelos ajar
SFX Ù ajar ájenla ajar
SFX Ù ajar ájenlas ajar
SFX Ù ajar ájenlo ajar
SFX Ù ajar ájenlos ajar
SFX Ù ambiar ámbiela ambiar
SFX Ù ambiar ámbielas ambiar
SFX Ù ambiar ámbielo ambiar
SFX Ù ambiar ámbielos ambiar
SFX Ù ambiar ámbienla ambiar
SFX Ù ambiar ámbienlas ambiar
SFX Ù ambiar ámbienlo ambiar
SFX Ù ambiar ámbienlos ambiar
SFX Ù ancar ánquela ancar
SFX Ù ancar ánquelas ancar
SFX Ù ancar ánquelo ancar
SFX Ù ancar ánquelos ancar
SFX Ù ancar ánquenla ancar
SFX Ù ancar ánquenlas ancar
SFX Ù ancar ánquenlo ancar
SFX Ù ancar ánquenlos ancar
SFX Ù anchar ánchela anchar
SFX Ù anchar ánchelas anchar
SFX Ù anchar ánchelo anchar
SFX Ù anchar ánchelos anchar
SFX Ù anchar ánchenla anchar
SFX Ù anchar ánchenlas anchar
SFX Ù anchar ánchenlo anchar
SFX Ù anchar ánchenlos anchar
SFX Ù andar ándela andar
SFX Ù andar ándelas andar
SFX Ù andar ándelo andar
SFX Ù andar ándelos andar
SFX Ù andar ándenla andar
SFX Ù andar ándenlas andar
SFX Ù andar ándenlo andar
SFX Ù andar ándenlos andar
SFX Ù andir ándala andir
SFX Ù andir ándalas andir
SFX Ù andir ándalo andir
SFX Ù andir ándalos andir
SFX Ù andir ándanla andir
SFX Ù andir ándanlas andir
SFX Ù andir ándanlo andir
SFX Ù andir ándanlos andir
SFX Ù añar áñela añar
SFX Ù añar áñelas añar
SFX Ù añar áñelo añar
SFX Ù añar áñelos añar
SFX Ù añar áñenla añar
SFX Ù añar áñenlas añar
SFX Ù añar áñenlo añar
SFX Ù añar áñenlos añar
SFX Ù apar ápela apar
SFX Ù apar ápelas apar
SFX Ù apar ápelo apar
SFX Ù apar ápelos apar
SFX Ù apar ápenla apar
SFX Ù apar ápenlas apar
SFX Ù apar ápenlo apar
SFX Ù apar ápenlos apar
SFX Ù arar árela arar
SFX Ù arar árelas arar
SFX Ù arar árelo arar
SFX Ù arar árelos arar
SFX Ù arar árenla arar
SFX Ù arar árenlas arar
SFX Ù arar árenlo arar
SFX Ù arar árenlos arar
SFX Ù ardar árdela ardar
SFX Ù ardar árdelas ardar
SFX Ù ardar árdelo ardar
SFX Ù ardar árdelos ardar
SFX Ù ardar árdenla ardar
SFX Ù ardar árdenlas ardar
SFX Ù ardar árdenlo ardar
SFX Ù ardar árdenlos ardar
SFX Ù arrar árrela arrar
SFX Ù arrar árrelas arrar
SFX Ù arrar árrelo arrar
SFX Ù arrar árrelos arrar
SFX Ù arrar árrenla arrar
SFX Ù arrar árrenlas arrar
SFX Ù arrar árrenlo arrar
SFX Ù arrar árrenlos arrar
SFX Ù artar ártela artar
SFX Ù artar ártelas artar
SFX Ù artar ártelo artar
SFX Ù artar ártelos artar
SFX Ù artar ártenla artar
SFX Ù artar ártenlas artar
SFX Ù artar ártenlo artar
SFX Ù artar ártenlos artar
SFX Ù artir ártala artir
SFX Ù artir ártalas artir
SFX Ù artir ártalo artir
SFX Ù artir ártalos artir
SFX Ù artir ártanla artir
SFX Ù artir ártanlas artir
SFX Ù artir ártanlo artir
SFX Ù artir ártanlos artir
SFX Ù asar ásela asar
SFX Ù asar áselas asar
SFX Ù asar áselo asar
SFX Ù asar áselos asar
SFX Ù asar ásenla asar
SFX Ù asar ásenlas asar
SFX Ù asar ásenlo asar
SFX Ù asar ásenlos asar
SFX Ù astrar ástrela astrar
SFX Ù astrar ástrelas astrar
SFX Ù astrar ástrelo astrar
SFX Ù astrar ástrelos astrar
SFX Ù astrar ástrenla astrar
SFX Ù astrar ástrenlas astrar
SFX Ù astrar ástrenlo astrar
SFX Ù astrar ástrenlos astrar
SFX Ù atar átela atar
SFX Ù atar átelas atar
SFX Ù atar átelo atar
SFX Ù atar átelos atar
SFX Ù atar átenla atar
SFX Ù atar átenlas atar
SFX Ù atar átenlo atar
SFX Ù atar átenlos atar
SFX Ù atir átala atir
SFX Ù atir átalas atir
SFX Ù atir átalo atir
SFX Ù atir átalos atir
SFX Ù atir átanla atir
SFX Ù atir átanlas atir
SFX Ù atir átanlo atir
SFX Ù atir átanlos atir
SFX Ù azar ácela azar
SFX Ù azar ácelas azar
SFX Ù azar ácelo azar
SFX Ù azar ácelos azar
SFX Ù azar ácenla azar
SFX Ù azar ácenlas azar
SFX Ù azar ácenlo azar
SFX Ù azar ácenlos azar
SFX Ù ear éela ear
SFX Ù ear éelas ear
SFX Ù ear éelo ear
SFX Ù ear éelos ear
SFX Ù ear éenla ear
SFX Ù ear éenlas ear
SFX Ù ear éenlo ear
SFX Ù ear éenlos ear
SFX Ù ecar équela ecar
SFX Ù ecar équelas ecar
SFX Ù ecar équelo ecar
SFX Ù ecar équelos ecar
SFX Ù ecar équenla ecar
SFX Ù ecar équenlas ecar
SFX Ù ecar équenlo ecar
SFX Ù ecar équenlos ecar
SFX Ù echar échela echar
SFX Ù echar échelas echar
SFX Ù echar échelo echar
SFX Ù echar échelos echar
SFX Ù echar échenla echar
SFX Ù echar échenlas echar
SFX Ù echar échenlo echar
SFX Ù echar échenlos echar
SFX Ù ectar éctela ectar
SFX Ù ectar éctelas ectar
SFX Ù ectar éctelo ectar
SFX Ù ectar éctelos ectar
SFX Ù ectar éctenla ectar
SFX Ù ectar éctenlas ectar
SFX Ù ectar éctenlo ectar
SFX Ù ectar éctenlos ectar
SFX Ù eer éala eer
SFX Ù eer éalas eer
SFX Ù eer éalo eer
SFX Ù eer éalos eer
SFX Ù eer éanla eer
SFX Ù eer éanlas eer
SFX Ù eer éanlo eer
SFX Ù eer éanlos eer
SFX Ù egar éguela egar
SFX Ù egar éguelas egar
SFX Ù egar éguelo egar
SFX Ù egar éguelos egar
SFX Ù egar éguenla egar
SFX Ù egar éguenlas egar
SFX Ù egar éguenlo egar
SFX Ù egar éguenlos egar
SFX Ù ejar éjela ejar
SFX Ù ejar éjelas ejar
SFX Ù ejar éjelo ejar
SFX Ù ejar éjelos ejar
SFX Ù ejar éjenla ejar
SFX Ù ejar éjenlas ejar
SFX Ù ejar éjenlo ejar
SFX Ù ejar éjenlos ejar
SFX Ù elar élela elar
SFX Ù elar élelas elar
SFX Ù elar élelo elar
SFX Ù elar élelos elar
SFX Ù elar élenla elar
SFX Ù elar élenlas elar
SFX Ù elar élenlo elar
SFX Ù elar élenlos elar
SFX Ù emar émela emar
SFX Ù emar émelas emar
SFX Ù emar émelo emar
SFX Ù emar émelos emar
SFX Ù emar émenla emar
SFX Ù emar émenlas emar
SFX Ù emar émenlo emar
SFX Ù emar émenlos emar
SFX Ù endar éndela endar
SFX Ù endar éndelas endar
SFX Ù endar éndelo endar
SFX Ù endar éndelos endar
SFX Ù endar éndenla endar
SFX Ù endar éndenlas endar
SFX Ù endar éndenlo endar
SFX Ù endar éndenlos endar
SFX Ù ender éndala ender
SFX Ù ender éndalas ender
SFX Ù ender éndalo ender
SFX Ù ender éndalos ender
SFX Ù ender éndanla ender
SFX Ù ender éndanlas ender
SFX Ù ender éndanlo ender
SFX Ù ender éndanlos ender
SFX Ù entar éntela entar
SFX Ù entar éntelas entar
SFX Ù entar éntelo entar
SFX Ù entar éntelos entar
SFX Ù entar éntenla entar
SFX Ù entar éntenlas entar
SFX Ù entar éntenlo entar
SFX Ù entar éntenlos entar
SFX Ù eptar éptela eptar
SFX Ù eptar éptelas eptar
SFX Ù eptar éptelo eptar
SFX Ù eptar éptelos eptar
SFX Ù eptar éptenla eptar
SFX Ù eptar éptenlas eptar
SFX Ù eptar éptenlo eptar
SFX Ù eptar éptenlos eptar
SFX Ù erar érela erar
SFX Ù erar érelas erar
SFX Ù erar érelo erar
SFX Ù erar érelos erar
SFX Ù erar érenla erar
SFX Ù erar érenlas erar
SFX Ù erar érenlo erar
SFX Ù erar érenlos erar
SFX Ù ercar érquela ercar
SFX Ù ercar érquelas ercar
SFX Ù ercar érquelo ercar
SFX Ù ercar érquelos ercar
SFX Ù ercar érquenla ercar
SFX Ù ercar érquenlas ercar
SFX Ù ercar érquenlo ercar
SFX Ù ercar érquenlos ercar
SFX Ù ergir érjala ergir
SFX Ù ergir érjalas ergir
SFX Ù ergir érjalo ergir
SFX Ù ergir érjalos ergir
SFX Ù ergir érjanla ergir
SFX Ù ergir érjanlas ergir
SFX Ù ergir érjanlo ergir
SFX Ù ergir érjanlos ergir
SFX Ù ervar érvela ervar
SFX Ù ervar érvelas ervar
SFX Ù ervar érvelo ervar
SFX Ù ervar érvelos ervar
SFX Ù ervar érvenla ervar
SFX Ù ervar érvenlas ervar
SFX Ù ervar érvenlo ervar
SFX Ù ervar érvenlos ervar
SFX Ù esar ésela esar
SFX Ù esar éselas esar
SFX Ù esar éselo esar
SFX Ù esar éselos esar
SFX Ù esar ésenla esar
SFX Ù esar ésenlas esar
SFX Ù esar ésenlo esar
SFX Ù esar ésenlos esar
SFX Ù etar étela etar
SFX Ù etar ételas etar
SFX Ù etar ételo etar
